Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 39 Disaster and Emergency Services Management

39.010.
Title. [Repealed.]

39.020.
State Defense Council created; purpose. [Repealed.]

39.030.
Membership of council; State Director of Civil Defense; quorum; personnel; compensation; travel. [Repealed.]

39.040.
Meetings of council; offices. [Repealed.]

39.050.
Powers and duties of council; funds. [Repealed.]

39.060.
Use of services and facilities of other agencies. [Repealed.]

39.070.
Local defense councils. [Repealed.]

39.080.
Regional defense councils. [Repealed.]

39.090.
Reports by council to Governor. [Repealed.]

39.100.
Title. [Repealed.]

39.110.
Definitions for KRS 39.120 to 39.220. [Repealed.]

39.120.
Effect of KRS 39.120 to 39.220 on other statutes; when to terminate. [Repealed.]

39.130.
Injury to or interference with property with intent to impede prosecution of defense or war; penalties. [Repealed.]

39.140.
Intentionally defective workmanship; penalty. [Repealed.]

39.150.
Attempt or solicitation to commit sabotage; penalty. [Repealed.]

39.160.
Conspiracy to commit sabotage; penalty. [Repealed.]

39.170.
Witnesses required to give evidence. [Repealed.]

39.180.
Posting of property used for defense or by utility; penalty for unlawful entry. [Repealed.]

39.190.
Closing and restricting use of highways and other areas; penalty for wrongful entry. [Repealed.]

39.200.
No injunction against closing or restricting order; mandamus allowed. [Repealed.]

39.210.
Detention, questioning and arrest of suspected persons. [Repealed.]

39.220.
Appointment of special police for premises essential to National Defense. [Repealed.]

39.230.
Fee to accompany application; use for expenses. [Repealed.]

39.240.
Oath and bond. [Repealed.]

39.250.
Powers and duties of special police; badge. [Repealed.]

39.260.
Compensation of special police. [Repealed.]

39.270.
Termination of appointment. [Repealed.]

39.280.
Repeal of KRS 39.220 to 39.270 when emergency is over. [Repealed.]

39.290.
Wartime. [Repealed.]